Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2422
Obtaining handgun for prohibited transfer; violation; penalty.

For purposes of sections 69-2401 to 69-2425, any person who knowingly and intentionally obtains a handgun for the purposes of transferring it to a person who is prohibited from receipt or possession of a handgun by state or federal law shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 21;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 8.